Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Retirement Plans

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11, effective July 1, 1984, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The former article consisted of §§

44-5-40

through 44-5-52 and was based on Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, §§ 9-11, 13, 14, 21, 27; Ga. L. 1966, p. 539, §§ 3-5; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1387, §§ 2-6; Ga. L. 1970, p. 201, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 210, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 747, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 699, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-5-40.
Power of employers to establish retirement plans; benefits under such plans; power to implement such plans by contract; financing of such plans.

Each employer is empowered to establish a plan or plans for the provision of retirement or employee benefits for its employees. Such plans shall be enacted by ordinance or resolution of the governing body of a municipal corporation or by a resolution of the governing body of other employers. The ordinance or resolution shall set forth the employees to be covered, the benefits to be provided, and the conditions of the plan. Benefits under the plan may include retirement and employee benefits. A plan for employee benefits may provide for the method of funding such benefits through the use of insurance, self-funding, or otherwise.

Any contract between the board of trustees and a member employer which provides a defined benefit plan shall contain a provision that such defined benefits are to be provided, to the extent fixed in such plan, by the employer and that the board of trustees does not guarantee the defined amount.

Each employer is further empowered to implement such plan or plans by contract with the board of trustees in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the board of trustees. The contract with the board of trustees shall be executed pursuant to the ordinance or resolution which enacted the plan.

Each employer is authorized to make reasonable classifications of employees in its plan and to provide for integration of its plan with social security benefits and with other retirement or pension plans under which certain classes of employees may be entitled to benefits.

Each employer is authorized to appropriate funds to provide the benefits under such plan and to pay its respective portion of the administrative costs of the board of trustees in administering the system. Except with respect to employee contributions to purchase additional service credit, an employee’s contribution under a defined benefit plan shall not exceed 50 percent of the value of such employee’s benefit payable from the plan upon commencement of benefits. The valuation of benefits under a defined benefit plan shall be made in accordance with the actuarial assumptions used to determine employer contributions in effect at the time of the determination.

Contributions paid by a municipal corporation shall be paid from municipal funds which are on hand or which will be collected in the year the contribution is made and shall not be deemed to create a debt of the municipal corporation.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1061, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 269, § 1/SB 336.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(1), inserted “or resolution”; and, in subsection (d), substituted the present second sentence for the former second sentence, which read: “In no event shall an employee’s contribution exceed 50 percent of the value of such employee’s benefit payable from the plan at the earlier of termination of employment or commencement of benefits”, and inserted “under a defined benefit plan” in the last sentence.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-5-41.
Establishment and use of master plans.

The board of trustees has the power to establish one or more master plans which may be adopted by any employer. The employees to be covered, the retirement and employee benefits to be provided, and the terms and conditions for retirement benefits and other benefits shall be provided in the master plan. A municipal corporation is empowered to adopt such a plan by ordinance or resolution and to execute an agreement with the board of trustees to provide retirement and employee benefits as provided in the plan. Other employers shall have the power to adopt such plans by resolution of its governing body and to execute such agreements. The agreement, plan, and trust entered into by each member employer shall constitute a separate plan and trust and should be considered as such by the board of trustees. A master plan providing employee benefits may provide for the method of funding such benefits through the use of insurance, self-funding, or otherwise.

Any agreement between the board of trustees and a member employer which provides a defined benefit plan shall contain a provision that such defined benefits are to be provided, to the extent fixed in the master plan, by the member employer and that the board of trustees does not guarantee the fixed amount.

The board of trustees is empowered to implement such plan by separate agreement with each employer which has adopted such plan by ordinance or resolution, in accordance with this chapter and with the rules and regulations promulgated by the board of trustees. Execution of an agreement between an employer and the board of trustees shall constitute a contract binding on both parties to provide benefits according to the plan and the terms set forth in the agreement.

The board of trustees is authorized to specify in the master plan reasonable employee classifications and to provide, where appropriate, for integration of the benefits provided in the master plan with social security benefits and with other retirement or pension plans under which certain classes of employees may be entitled to benefits. The board of trustees shall incorporate into the master plan the provisions authorized in Code Sections 47-5-42, 47-5-43, and 47-5-44, relative to the selection of various plan features.

Employers are authorized to appropriate funds to provide the benefits specified in such master plan and to pay their portion of the administrative costs of the board of trustees in administering the system. Except with respect to employee contributions to purchase additional service credit, an employee’s contribution under a defined benefit plan shall not exceed 50 percent of the value of such employee’s benefit payable from the plan upon commencement of benefits. The valuation of benefits under a defined benefit plan shall be made in accordance with the actuarial assumptions used to determine employer contributions in effect at the time of the determination.

Contributions paid by a municipal corporation shall be paid from municipal funds which are on hand or which will be collected in the year the contribution is made and shall not be deemed to create a debt of the municipal corporation.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1061, § 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 269, § 2/SB 336.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in paragraph (a)(1), deleted “that, upon the date that it agrees to join the plan, has fewer than 16 employees who elect and are qualified for plan participation” following “any employer” at the end of the first sentence, and, in the third sentence, inserted “or resolution” and deleted “and to designate a board of trustees of the plan” following “plan” at the end; and, in subsection (d), substituted the present second sentence for the former second sentence, which read: “In no event shall an employee’s contribution exceed 50 percent of the value of such employee’s benefit payable from the plan at the earlier of termination of employment or commencement of benefits” and, in the third sentence, inserted “under a defined benefit plan”.

47-5-42.
Provisions of contracts and plans.

Each member employer that has adopted a plan for the provision of retirement benefits or employee benefits under Code Section 47-5-40 is authorized in its plan and contract to include such provisions as are necessary for the development of a suitable plan, which provisions shall be subject to the approval of the board of trustees, including, but not limited to, the following:

Minimum age at entry into its plan;

Minimum years of service at entry into its plan;

Maximum years of service credit allowable;

Provisions relating to separation and return to employment;

Types of benefits to be provided;

Types of vesting provisions, if any, to be provided;

Types of disability retirement provisions, if any, to be provided;

Minimum years of required participation in the plan;

Provisions relating to benefits for part-time employment; and

Any other provisions necessary, incidental, or helpful in providing the intended benefits.

The board of trustees is authorized to reject any contract provision which it determines to be actuarially unsound or which it determines would create an undue administrative burden.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1359, § 1.

47-5-43.
Provisions for early and normal retirement ages.

Each member employer may provide in its plan for early and normal retirement ages. A member employer may defer the retirement of an employee who has reached normal retirement age.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11.

47-5-44.
Credit for prior service.

Each member employer that has adopted a plan providing retirement benefits under Code Section 47-5-40 is authorized in its plan and contract to determine what credit, if any, shall be allowed for prior service. The financial liability incurred by the member employer for any such prior service credits allowed shall be actuarially determined and incorporated in the contract, which shall set forth the manner in which such liability shall be defrayed by the member employer.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11.

47-5-45.
Uninterrupted participation during transfer from one member municipality to another.

The board of trustees may provide rules under which contracts with member employers may provide for uninterrupted participation by a participating employee who transfers his employment from one member municipality to another.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11.

47-5-46.
Transfer of credits.

Member employers which provide retirement benefits under a local or special Act may contract with the board of trustees for transfer of credits to this retirement system and continuation of accrued benefits to their employees under terms which may be provided by amendment to such local or special Act and which are not inconsistent with this chapter or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. Otherwise, this chapter is not intended to affect existing retirement or pension systems established by local or special Act or to preclude the establishment of individual employer retirement systems by future local or special Acts.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11.

47-5-47.
Return of contributions to employee or employee’s estate.

Except as otherwise provided with respect to the provision of death benefits under a plan, plans providing for retirement benefits established under this chapter shall provide that mandatory contributions made by a participating employee shall be returned to such employee’s surviving spouse or to the estate of the participant or the participant’s pre-retirement beneficiary in the event of death before retirement. If the employee is separated from employment prior to the time he or she is eligible for retirement benefits, such contributions shall be returned unless the employee chooses to claim his or her vested benefits, in which case the employee contributions shall remain with the fund until such time as the employee becomes eligible for the vested benefits. Such contributions may be returned without interest or with such interest as is provided in the plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 11; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 4/HB 266.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Except as otherwise provided with respect to the provision of death benefits under a plan, plans” for “Plans” at the beginning of this Code section; substituted “employee’s surviving spouse or to the estate of the participant or the participant’s pre-retirement beneficiary” for “employee or his estate” near the middle of this Code section; and near the end of this Code section, substituted “he or she is eligible” for “he is eligible” and substituted “his or her vested benefits” for “his vested benefits”.